Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.  ORS 419B.015 is amended to read:
419B.015. (1)(a) A person making a report of child abuse, whether the report is made  voluntarily
or is required by ORS  419B.010, shall make an oral report by telephone or otherwise to the local
office of the Department of Human Services, to the designee of the department or  to a law
enforcement agency within the county where the person making the report is located at the  time
of the contact. The report shall contain, if known, the names and addresses of  the child and the
parents of the child  or other persons responsible for care of the child, the child’s age, the nature
and extent  of the abuse, including any evidence of previous abuse, the explanation given for the
abuse and any other information that the person making the report believes might be helpful  in es-
tablishing the cause of the abuse and the identity of the perpetrator.
(b) When a report of child abuse is received by the department,  the department shall notify a
law enforcement agency within the county where  the report was made. When a report of child abuse
is received by a designee of  the department, the designee shall notify, according to the contract,
either the department or a law enforcement agency within the county where the  report was made.
When a report of child abuse is received by a  law enforcement agency, the agency shall notify the
local office of the department within the county where the report was made.
(c) When a report of  child abuse is received by the department or by a law enforcement
agency, the department or  law enforcement agency, or both, may collect information con-
cerning the military status  of the parent or guardian of the child who is the subject of the
report and may share the information with  the appropriate military authorities. Disclosure
of information under this paragraph is subject to ORS 419B.035 (7).
(2) When a report of child abuse is received under subsection (1)(a) of this  section, the entity
receiving the report shall make the notification required  by subsection (1)(b) of this section ac-
cording to rules adopted by the department under ORS 419B.017.
(3)(a) When a report alleging  that a child or ward in substitute care may have been subjected
to abuse is received by the department, the  department shall notify the attorney for the child or
ward, the child’s or  ward’s court appointed special advocate, the parents of the child or ward and
any attorney representing a parent of the child or ward that a report has been received.
(b) The name  and address of and other identifying information about the person who made the
report may not be disclosed under this subsection.  Any person or entity to whom notification is
made under this subsection may not release any information not authorized by this subsection.
Enrolled House Bill 2930 (HB 2930-A) Page 1
(c) The department shall make the notification required by this subsection within three  business
days of receiving the report of abuse.
(d) Notwithstanding the obligation  imposed by this subsection, the department is not required
under this subsection to notify the parent or parent’s attorney that a report of abuse has been re-
ceived if the notification may interfere  with an investigation or assessment or jeopardize the child’s
or ward’s safety.
SECTION 2.
The amendments to ORS 419B.015 by section 1 of  this 2017 Act apply to re-
ports of child abuse made on or after the effective date of this 2017 Act.
Passed by House April 26, 2017
..................................................................................
Timothy G. Sekerak, Chief Clerk of House
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Speaker of House
Passed by Senate May 24, 2017
..................................................................................
Peter Courtney, President of Senate
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2017
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2017
..................................................................................
Kate Brown, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2017
..................................................................................
Dennis Richardson, Secretary of State
Enrolled House Bill 2930 (HB 2930-A) Page 2